pl: Dołączone elementy akustycznego zestawu perkusyjnego: Bęben basowy w zestawie; Stopa do bębna basowego w zestawie; Pokrowce w zestawie; Talerz(e) crash w zestawie; Zestaw talerzy w zestawie; Statyw(y) pod talerze w zestawie; Naciągi w zestawie; Rama perkusyjna w zestawie; Pałeczki w zestawie; Tom podłogowy w zestawie; Talerze hi-hat w zestawie; Statyw do hi-hatu w zestawie; Osprzęt montażowy w zestawie; Zawieszany(-e) tom(y) w zestawie; Talerz ride w zestawie; Tylko zestaw korpusów; Korpusy + zestaw talerzy; Korpusy + osprzęt + talerze + stołek; Korpusy + zestaw osprzętu; Korpusy + zestaw osprzętu + talerze; Korpusy + werbel; Korpusy + pałki/miotełki; Korpusy + stołek; Tylko korpusy; Werbel w zestawie; Statyw pod werbel w zestawie; Stołek w zestawie; Inne
nb: Komponenter for akustisk trommesett inkludert: Stortromme inkludert; Stortrommepedal inkludert; Bærevesker inkludert; Crash-cymbal(er) inkludert; Cymbalpakke inkludert; Cymbalstativ inkludert; Trommeskinn inkludert; Trommerack inkludert; Trommestikker inkludert; Gulvtam inkludert; Hi-hat-cymbaler inkludert; Hi-hat-stativ inkludert; Monteringsutstyr inkludert; Rack-tam(mer) inkludert; Ride-cymbal inkludert; Kun skallpakke; Skall + cymbalpakke; Skall + hardware + cymbaler + krakk; Skall + hardware-pakke; Skall + hardware-pakke + cymbaler; Skall + skarptromme; Skall + stikker/visper; Skall + krakk; Kun skall; Skarptromme inkludert; Skarptrommestativ inkludert; Krakk inkludert; Annet
ko: 포함된 어쿠스틱 드럼 키트 구성품: 베이스 드럼 포함; 베이스 드럼 페달 포함; 운반 케이스 포함; 크래시 심벌 포함; 심벌 팩 포함; 심벌 스탠드 포함; 드럼 헤드 포함; 드럼 랙 포함; 드럼 스틱 포함; 플로어 탐 포함; 하이햇 심벌 포함; 하이햇 스탠드 포함; 장착 하드웨어 포함; 랙 탐 포함; 라이드 심벌 포함; 쉘 팩만 포함; 쉘 + 심벌 팩; 쉘 + 하드웨어 + 심벌 + 쓰론; 쉘 + 하드웨어 팩; 쉘 + 하드웨어 팩 + 심벌; 쉘 + 스네어; 쉘 + 스틱/브러시; 쉘 + 쓰론; 쉘만 포함; 스네어 드럼 포함; 스네어 스탠드 포함; 쓰론 포함; 기타
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta akustičnih bubnjeva: Uključen bas-bubanj; Uključena pedala za bas-bubanj; Uključene torbe za nošenje; Uključena crash činela (ili više njih); Uključen komplet činela; Uključen stalak za činele (ili više njih); Uključene opne za bubnjeve; Uključen okvir za bubnjeve; Uključene palice za bubnjeve; Uključen podni tom; Uključene hi-hat činele; Uključen stalak za hi-hat; Uključen hardver za montažu; Uključen rack tom (ili više njih); Uključena ride činela; Samo komplet elemenata (shell pack); Elementi + komplet činela; Elementi + hardver + činele + stolac; Elementi + komplet hardvera; Elementi + komplet hardvera + činele; Elementi + doboš; Elementi + palice / metlice; Elementi + stolac; Samo elementi; Uključen doboš; Uključen stalak za doboš; Uključen stolac; Ostalo
tr: Akustik davul kiti bileşenleri dahildir.: Bas davul dahil; Bas davul pedalı dahil; Taşıma çantası dahil; Crash zil(leri) dahil; Zil seti dahil; Zil sehpası(ları) dahil; Davul derisi dahil; Davul rack sistemi dahil; Baget dahil; Floor tom dahil; Hi-hat zili dahil; Hi-hat sehpası dahil; Montaj donanımı dahil; Rack tom(lar) dahil; Ride zili dahil; Yalnızca gövde seti; Gövdeler + zil seti; Gövdeler + donanım + ziller + tabure; Gövdeler + donanım seti; Gövdeler + donanım seti + ziller; Gövdeler + trampet; Gövdeler + bagetler/fırçalar; Gövdeler + tabure; Yalnızca gövdeler; Trampet dahil; Trampet sehpası dahil; Tabure dahil; Diğer
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia súpravy akustických bicích: Vrátane basového bubna; Vrátane pedála na basový bubon; Vrátane prenosných obalov; Vrátane činelov crash; Vrátane súpravy činelov; Vrátane stojanov na činely; Vrátane blán na bubny; Vrátane rampy na bubny; Vrátane paličiek na bubny; Vrátane kotla (floor tom); Vrátane činelov hi-hat; Vrátane stojana na hi-hat; Vrátane montážneho hardvéru; Vrátane prechodov (rack toms); Vrátane činela ride; Iba súprava bubnov (shell pack); Bubny a súprava činelov; Bubny, hardvér, činely a stolička; Bubny a súprava hardvéru; Bubny, súprava hardvéru a činely; Bubny a malý bubon; Bubny a paličky/metličky; Bubny a stolička; Iba bubny; Vrátane malého bubna; Vrátane stojana na malý bubon; Vrátane stoličky; Iné
ja: アコースティックドラムキットの構成部品が含まれています: バスドラム付き; バスドラムペダル付き; キャリングケース付き; クラッシュシンバル付き; シンバルパック付き; シンバルスタンド付き; ドラムヘッド付き; ドラムラック付き; ドラムスティック付き; フロアタム付き; ハイハットシンバル付き; ハイハットスタンド付き; マウント用ハードウェア付き; ラックタム付き; ライドシンバル付き; シェルパックのみ; シェル + シンバルパック; シェル + ハードウェア + シンバル + スローン; シェル + ハードウェアパック; シェル + ハードウェアパック + シンバル; シェル + スネア; シェル + スティック/ブラシ; シェル + スローン; シェルのみ; スネアドラム付き; スネアスタンド付き; スローン付き; その他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα ακουστικού ντράμκιτ: Περιλαμβάνεται κάσα; Περιλαμβάνεται πετάλι κάσας; Περιλαμβάνονται θήκες μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνονται πιατίνια crash; Περιλαμβάνεται σετ πιατινιών; Περιλαμβάνονται βάσεις πιατινιών; Περιλαμβάνονται δέρματα τυμπάνων; Περιλαμβάνεται ικρίωμα (rack) τυμπάνων; Περιλαμβάνονται μπαγκέτες; Περιλαμβάνεται βαθύ (floor tom); Περιλαμβάνονται πιατίνια hi-hat; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση hi-hat; Περιλαμβάνεται υλικός εξοπλισμός στήριξης; Περιλαμβάνονται τομ (rack toms); Περιλαμβάνεται πιατίνι ride; Μόνο κελύφη (shell pack); Κελύφη + σετ πιατινιών; Κελύφη + εξοπλισμός + πιατίνια + κάθισμα; Κελύφη + σετ εξοπλισμού; Κελύφη + σετ εξοπλισμού + πιατίνια; Κελύφη + ταμπούρο; Κελύφη + μπαγκέτες/σκουπάκια; Κελύφη + κάθισμα; Μόνο κελύφη; Περιλαμβάνεται ταμπούρο; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση ταμπούρου; Περιλαμβάνεται κάθισμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeina akustinių būgnų rinkinio komponentai: Pridedamas žemų dažnių būgnas; Pridedamas žemų dažnių būgno pedalas; Pridedami dėklai; Pridedama „Crash“ lėkštė (-ės); Pridedamas lėkščių rinkinys; Pridedamas (-i) lėkščių stovas (-ai); Pridedamos būgnų membranos; Pridedamas būgnų rėmas; Pridedamos būgnų lazdelės; Pridedamas pastatomas tomas; Pridedamos „Hi-hat“ lėkštės; Pridedamas „Hi-hat“ lėkščių stovas; Pridedama tvirtinimo įranga; Pridedamas (-i) pakabinamas (-i) tomas (-ai); Pridedama „Ride“ lėkštė; Tik būgnų korpusai; Būgnų korpusai ir lėkščių rinkinys; Būgnų korpusai, tvirtinimo įranga, lėkštės ir kėdutė; Būgnų korpusai ir tvirtinimo įrangos rinkinys; Būgnų korpusai, tvirtinimo įrangos rinkinys ir lėkštės; Būgnų korpusai ir mažasis būgnas; Būgnų korpusai ir lazdelės / šluotelės; Būgnų korpusai ir kėdutė; Tik būgnų korpusai; Pridedamas mažasis būgnas; Pridedamas mažojo būgno stovas; Pridedama kėdutė; Kita
fr: Composants inclus dans le kit de batterie acoustique: Grosse caisse incluse; Pédale de grosse caisse incluse; Étuis de transport inclus; Cymbale(s) crash incluse(s); Pack de cymbales inclus; Pied(s) de cymbale inclus; Peaux de batterie incluses; Rack de batterie inclus; Baguettes de batterie incluses; Tom basse inclus; Cymbale(s) charleston incluse(s); Pédale charleston incluse; Matériel de montage inclus; Tom(s) suspendu(s) inclus; Cymbale ride incluse; Fûts seuls; Fûts et pack de cymbales; Fûts, matériel, cymbales et siège; Fûts et pack de matériel; Fûts, pack de matériel et cymbales; Fûts et caisse claire; Fûts et baguettes/balais; Fûts et siège; Fûts seuls; Caisse claire incluse; Pied de caisse claire inclus; Siège inclus; Autre
en: Acoustic drum kit components included: Bass drum included; Bass drum pedal included; Carrying cases included; Crash cymbal(s) included; Cymbal pack included; Cymbal stand(s) included; Drum heads included; Drum rack included; Drum sticks included; Floor tom included; Hi-hat cymbals included; Hi-hat stand included; Mounting hardware included; Rack tom(s) included; Ride cymbal included; Shell pack only; Shells + cymbal pack; Shells + hardware + cymbals + throne; Shells + hardware pack; Shells + hardware pack + cymbals; Shells + snare; Shells + sticks/brushes; Shells + throne; Shells only; Snare drum included; Snare stand included; Throne included; Other
zh-CN: 包括原声架子鼓/爵士鼓套件组件: 包含低音鼓; 包含低音鼓踏板; 包含便携箱; 包含碎音镲; 包含镲片包; 包含镲片架; 包含鼓皮; 包含鼓架; 包含鼓槌; 包含落地鼓; 包含踩镲; 包含踩镲架; 包含安装硬件; 包含嗵鼓; 包含叮叮镲; 仅包含鼓腔包; 鼓腔 + 镲片包; 鼓腔 + 硬件 + 镲片 + 鼓凳; 鼓腔 + 硬件包; 鼓腔 + 硬件包 + 镲片; 鼓腔 + 军鼓; 鼓腔 + 鼓槌/鼓刷; 鼓腔 + 鼓凳; 仅包含鼓腔; 包含军鼓; 包含军鼓架; 包含鼓凳; 其他
da: Komponenter til akustisk trommesæt inkluderet: Stortromme medfølger; Stortrommepedal medfølger; Bæretasker medfølger; Crash-bækken(er) medfølger; Bækkenpakke medfølger; Bækkenstativ(er) medfølger; Trommeskind medfølger; Trommerack medfølger; Trommestikker medfølger; Gulvtam medfølger; Hihat-bækkener medfølger; Hihat-stativ medfølger; Monteringshardware medfølger; Hængetam(mer) medfølger; Ride-bækken medfølger; Kun kedelpakke; Kedler + bækkenpakke; Kedler + hardware + bækkener + trommestol; Kedler + hardwarepakke; Kedler + hardwarepakke + bækkener; Kedler + lilletromme; Kedler + stikker/ whiskers; Kedler + trommestol; Kun kedler; Lilletromme medfølger; Lilletrommestativ medfølger; Trommestol medfølger; Andet
ru: Комплектация акустической ударной установки: Бас-барабан в комплекте; Педаль для бас-барабана в комплекте; Чехлы для переноски в комплекте; Тарелки крэш в комплекте; Набор тарелок в комплекте; Стойки для тарелок в комплекте; Пластики в комплекте; Рама для барабанов в комплекте; Барабанные палочки в комплекте; Напольный том в комплекте; Тарелки хай-хэт в комплекте; Стойка для хай-хэта в комплекте; Крепежное оборудование в комплекте; Подвесные томы в комплекте; Тарелка райд в комплекте; Только шелл-пак; Шелл-пак + набор тарелок; Барабаны + хардвер + тарелки + стул; Барабаны + набор хардвера; Барабаны + набор хардвера + тарелки; Шелл-пак + малый барабан; Шелл-пак + палочки/щетки; Шелл-пак + стул; Только барабаны (шелл-пак); Малый барабан в комплекте; Стойка для малого барабана в комплекте; Стул в комплекте; Другое
es: Componentes del kit de batería acústica incluidos: Bombo incluido; Pedal de bombo incluido; Estuches de transporte incluidos; Platillos crash incluidos; Paquete de platillos incluido; Soportes para platillos incluidos; Parches incluidos; Rack de batería incluido; Baquetas incluidas; Tom de piso incluido; Platillos hi-hat incluidos; Soporte para hi-hat incluido; Hardware de montaje incluido; Toms aéreos incluidos; Platillo ride incluido; Solo paquete de cascos; Cascos y paquete de platillos; Cascos, hardware, platillos y sillín; Cascos y paquete de hardware; Cascos, paquete de hardware y platillos; Cascos y redoblante; Cascos y baquetas/escobillas; Cascos y sillín; Solo cascos; Redoblante incluido; Soporte de redoblante incluido; Sillín incluido; Otro
sl-SI: Vključene komponente kompleta akustičnega bobna: Vključen bas boben; Vključen pedal za bas boben; Vključene torbe za prenašanje; Vključene činele crash; Vključen komplet činel; Vključena stojala za činele; Vključene opne za bobne; Vključeno ogrodje za bobne; Vključene bobnarske palčke; Vključen stoječi tom; Vključene činele hi-hat; Vključeno stojalo za hi-hat; Vključena pritrdilna oprema; Vključeni viseči tomi; Vključena činela ride; Samo osnovni komplet (shell pack); Osnovni komplet + komplet činel; Osnovni komplet + strojna oprema + činele + stol; Osnovni komplet + komplet strojne opreme; Osnovni komplet + komplet strojne opreme + činele; Osnovni komplet + mali boben (snare); Osnovni komplet + palčke/metlice; Osnovni komplet + stol; Samo osnovni komplet; Vključen mali boben; Vključeno stojalo za mali boben; Vključen stol; Drugo
th: รวมส่วนประกอบของชุดกลองอะคูสติก: รวมกลองเบส; รวมกระเดื่องกลอง; รวมกระเป๋าใส่กลอง; รวมฉาบแครช; รวมชุดฉาบ; รวมขาตั้งฉาบ; รวมหนังกลอง; รวมโครงตั้งกลอง; รวมไม้กลอง; รวมฟลอร์ทอม; รวมฉาบไฮแฮท; รวมขาตั้งไฮแฮท; รวมฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับติดตั้ง; รวมแร็คทอม; รวมฉาบไรด์; เฉพาะชุดตัวถังกลอง; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + ชุดฉาบ; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + ฮาร์ดแวร์ + ฉาบ + เก้าอี้กลอง; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + ชุดฮาร์ดแวร์; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + ชุดฮาร์ดแวร์ + ฉาบ; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + สแนร์; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + ไม้กลอง/แปรงลวด; ชุดตัวถังกลอง + เก้าอี้กลอง; เฉพาะชุดตัวถังกลองเท่านั้น; รวมกลองสแนร์; รวมขาตั้งสแนร์; รวมเก้าอี้กลอง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Componente incluse în kitul de tobe acustice: Tobă mare inclusă; Pedală pentru tobă mare inclusă; Huse de transport incluse; Talgere crash incluse; Pachet de talgere inclus; Stative pentru talgere incluse; Fețe de tobă incluse; Rack pentru tobe inclus; Bețe de tobă incluse; Tom de podea inclus; Talgere fus-cinel incluse; Stativ fus-cinel inclus; Echipament pentru montare inclus; Tom(uri) de rack incluse; Talger ride inclus; Doar pachet de corpuri de tobă; Corpuri de tobă + pachet de talgere; Corpuri de tobă + hardware + talgere + scaun; Corpuri de tobă + pachet hardware; Corpuri de tobă + pachet hardware + talgere; Corpuri de tobă + tobă mică; Corpuri de tobă + bețe/măturici; Corpuri de tobă + scaun; Doar corpuri de tobă; Tobă mică inclusă; Stativ pentru tobă mică inclus; Scaun inclus; Altele
it: Componenti del kit di batteria acustica inclusi: Grancassa inclusa; Pedale della grancassa incluso; Custodie incluse; Piatto/i crash incluso/i; Set di piatti incluso; Asta/e per piatti inclusa/e; Pelli incluse; Rack per batteria incluso; Bacchette per batteria incluse; Timpano incluso; Piatti hi-hat inclusi; Asta per hi-hat inclusa; Hardware di montaggio incluso; Tom sospeso/i incluso/i; Piatto ride incluso; Solo shell pack; Fusti + set di piatti; Fusti + hardware + piatti + seggiolino; Fusti + set hardware; Fusti + set hardware + piatti; Fusti + rullante; Fusti + bacchette/spazzole; Fusti + seggiolino; Solo fusti; Rullante incluso; Reggirullante incluso; Seggiolino incluso; Altro
hu: Akusztikus dobkészletalkatrészeket tartalmaz: Lábdob mellékelve; Lábdobpedál mellékelve; Hordtáskák mellékelve; Beütőcintányér(ok) mellékelve; Cintányérkészlet mellékelve; Cintányérállvány(ok) mellékelve; Bőrök mellékelve; Dobkarám mellékelve; Dobverők mellékelve; Állótam mellékelve; Lábcin mellékelve; Lábcinállvány mellékelve; Rögzítő hardver mellékelve; Függőtam(ok) mellékelve; Kísérőcintányér mellékelve; Csak dobtestek (shell pack); Dobtestek + cintányérkészlet; Dobtestek + hardver + cintányérok + dobszék; Dobtestek + hardverkészlet; Dobtestek + hardverkészlet + cintányérok; Dobtestek + pergődob; Dobtestek + dobverők/seprűk; Dobtestek + dobszék; Csak dobtestek; Pergődob mellékelve; Pergőállvány mellékelve; Dobszék mellékelve; Egyéb
bg-BG: Включени компоненти за акустичен барабанен комплект: Включен бас барабан; Включен педал за бас барабан; Включени калъфи за пренасяне; Включен(и) краш чинел(и); Включен комплект чинели; Включена(и) стойка(и) за чинели; Включени кожи за барабани; Включена рамка за барабани; Включени палки за барабани; Включен флор том; Включени фус чинели; Включена стойка за фус; Включен хардуер за монтаж; Включен(и) рак том(ове); Включен райд чинел; Само барабани (shell pack); Барабани + комплект чинели; Барабани + хардуер + чинели + столче; Барабани + хардуерен комплект; Барабани + хардуерен комплект + чинели; Барабани + соло барабан; Барабани + палки/четки; Барабани + столче; Само барабани; Включен соло барабан; Включена стойка за соло барабан; Включено столче; Други
sv: Komponenter till akustiskt trumset ingår: Bastrumma ingår; Bastrumpedal ingår; Bärväskor ingår; Crashcymbal(er) ingår; Cymbalpaket ingår; Cymbalstativ ingår; Trumskinn ingår; Trumrack ingår; Trumpinnar ingår; Golvpuka ingår; Hi-hat-cymbaler ingår; Hi-hat-stativ ingår; Monteringsutrustning ingår; Hängpuka/hängpukor ingår; Ridecymbal ingår; Endast trumstommar; Trumstommar + cymbalpaket; Trumstommar + utrustning + cymbaler + trumpall; Trumstommar + utrustningspaket; Trumstommar + utrustningspaket + cymbaler; Trumstommar + virveltrumma; Trumstommar + pinnar/vispar; Trumstommar + trumpall; Endast trumstommar; Virveltrumma ingår; Virvelstativ ingår; Trumpall ingår; Övrigt
cs: Obsažené součásti akustické bicí soupravy: Včetně basového bubnu; Včetně pedálu k basovému bubnu; Včetně přepravních obalů; Včetně činelu crash; Včetně sady činelů; Včetně stojanů na činely; Včetně blan; Včetně bubenické rampy; Včetně paliček; Včetně kotle (floor tom); Včetně činelů hi-hat; Včetně stojanu na hi-hat; Včetně montážního hardwaru; Včetně přechodů (rack tom); Včetně činelu ride; Pouze souprava bubnů (shell pack); Bubny + sada činelů; Bubny + hardware + činely + stolička; Bubny + sada hardwaru; Bubny + sada hardwaru + činely; Bubny + malý buben (snare); Bubny + paličky/špejle; Bubny + stolička; Pouze bubny; Včetně malého bubnu (snare); Včetně stojanu na malý buben; Včetně stoličky; Ostatní
fi: Akustisen rumpusetin komponentit sisältyvät lähetykseen: Bassorumpu mukana; Bassorummun pedaali mukana; Kantolaukut mukana; Crash-symbaali(t) mukana; Symbaalipaketti mukana; Symbaaliteline(et) mukana; Rumpukalvot mukana; Rumpukehikko mukana; Rumpukapulat mukana; Lattiatomi mukana; Hi-hat-symbaalit mukana; Hi-hat-teline mukana; Kiinnitystarvikkeet mukana; Räkkitomi(t) mukana; Ride-symbaali mukana; Vain rumpurungot; Rungot + symbaalipaketti; Rungot + telineet + symbaalit + tuoli; Rungot + telinepaketti; Rungot + telinepaketti + symbaalit; Rungot + virveli; Rungot + kapulat/vispilät; Rungot + tuoli; Vain rungot; Virvelirumpu mukana; Virveliteline mukana; Rumputuoli mukana; Muu
vi: Bao gồm các bộ linh kiện của bộ trống acoustic: Bao gồm trống bass; Bao gồm pedal trống bass; Bao gồm hộp đựng; Bao gồm chũm chọe crash; Bao gồm bộ chũm chọe; Bao gồm giá đỡ chũm chọe; Bao gồm mặt trống; Bao gồm giá trống; Bao gồm dùi trống; Bao gồm trống floor tom; Bao gồm chũm chọe hi-hat; Bao gồm giá đỡ hi-hat; Bao gồm phần cứng gắn; Bao gồm trống rack tom; Bao gồm chũm chọe ride; Chỉ có bộ vỏ trống; Vỏ trống + bộ chũm chọe; Vỏ trống + phần cứng + chũm chọe + ghế ngồi; Vỏ trống + bộ phần cứng; Vỏ trống + bộ phần cứng + chũm chọe; Vỏ trống + trống snare; Vỏ trống + dùi/chổi trống; Vỏ trống + ghế ngồi; Chỉ có vỏ trống; Bao gồm trống snare; Bao gồm giá đỡ snare; Bao gồm ghế ngồi; Khác
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen van het akoestische drumstel: Basdrum inbegrepen; Basdrumpedaal inbegrepen; Draagtassen inbegrepen; Crashbekken(s) inbegrepen; Bekkenpakket inbegrepen; Bekkenstandaard(s) inbegrepen; Drumvellen inbegrepen; Drumrek inbegrepen; Drumstokken inbegrepen; Floortom inbegrepen; Hihatbekkens inbegrepen; Hihatstandaard inbegrepen; Bevestigingshardware inbegrepen; Racktom(s) inbegrepen; Ridebekken inbegrepen; Alleen ketelset; Ketels + bekkenpakket; Ketels + hardware + bekkens + kruk; Ketels + hardwarepakket; Ketels + hardwarepakket + bekkens; Ketels + snare; Ketels + stokken/brushes; Ketels + kruk; Alleen ketels; Snaredrum inbegrepen; Snarestandaard inbegrepen; Kruk inbegrepen; Overig
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des akustischen Schlagzeug-Sets: Inklusive Bassdrum; Inklusive Bassdrum-Pedal; Inklusive Tragetaschen; Inklusive Crash-Becken; Inklusive Beckenset; Inklusive Beckenständer; Inklusive Trommelfelle; Inklusive Drum-Rack; Inklusive Drumsticks; Inklusive Floor-Tom; Inklusive Hi-Hat-Becken; Inklusive Hi-Hat-Ständer; Inklusive Montage-Hardware; Inklusive Rack-Tom(s); Inklusive Ride-Becken; Nur Kesselsatz; Kessel + Beckenset; Kessel + Hardware + Becken + Hocker; Kessel + Hardware-Paket; Kessel + Hardware-Paket + Becken; Kessel + Snare; Kessel + Sticks/Besen; Kessel + Hocker; Nur Kessel; Inklusive Snaredrum; Inklusive Snare-Ständer; Inklusive Hocker; Andere
pt-BR: Componentes acústicos do kit de tambores incluídos: Bumbo incluído; Pedal de bumbo incluído; Estojos de transporte incluídos; Prato(s) de ataque incluído(s); Conjunto de pratos incluído; Estante(s) de prato incluída(s); Peles de bateria incluídas; Rack de bateria incluído; Baquetas incluídas; Surdo incluído; Pratos de chimbal incluídos; Máquina de chimbal incluída; Ferragens de montagem incluídas; Tom(s) de rack incluído(s); Prato de condução incluído; Apenas tambores; Tambores + conjunto de pratos; Tambores + ferragens + pratos + banco; Tambores + conjunto de ferragens; Tambores + conjunto de ferragens + pratos; Tambores + caixa; Tambores + baquetas/vassourinhas; Tambores + banco; Apenas tambores; Caixa incluída; Estante de caixa incluída; Banco incluído; Outros
zh-TW: 包含原聲鼓組組件: 含大鼓; 含大鼓踏板; 含攜行袋; 含碎音鈸; 含套鈸; 含銅鈸架; 含鼓皮; 含鼓架; 含鼓棒; 含落地鼓; 含腳踏鈸; 含腳踏鈸架; 含安裝硬體; 含中鼓; 含節奏鈸; 僅含空鼓組; 空鼓組 + 套鈸; 空鼓組 + 硬體 + 銅鈸 + 鼓椅; 空鼓組 + 硬體套組; 空鼓組 + 硬體套組 + 銅鈸; 空鼓組 + 小鼓; 空鼓組 + 鼓棒/鼓刷; 空鼓組 + 鼓椅; 僅含空鼓組; 含小鼓; 含小鼓架; 含鼓椅; 其他
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no kit de bateria acústica: Bombo incluído; Pedal de bombo incluído; Estojos de transporte incluídos; Prato(s) crash incluído(s); Conjunto de pratos incluído; Suporte(s) de pratos incluído(s); Peles de bateria incluídas; Rack de bateria incluído; Baquetas de bateria incluídas; Tom de chão incluído; Pratos de choque incluídos; Suporte de pratos de choque incluído; Equipamento de montagem incluído; Tom(s) de rack incluído(s); Prato ride incluído; Apenas conjunto de cascos; Cascos + conjunto de pratos; Cascos + equipamento + pratos + banco; Cascos + conjunto de equipamento; Cascos + conjunto de equipamento + pratos; Cascos + tarola; Cascos + baquetas/vassouras; Cascos + banco; Apenas cascos; Tarola incluída; Suporte de tarola incluído; Banco incluído; Outro